North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153A. Counties.
Article 4. Form of Government.
§ 153A-64.
Filing results of election.

If the proposition is approved under

G.S. 153A-61

, a certified true copy of the resolution and a copy of the abstract of the election shall be filed with the Secretary of State, and with the Legislative Library.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 935, s. 1; 1989, c. 191, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Craven: 2001-447, s. 2 (applicable only to resolutions adopted before January 1, 2002); Dare: 1991, Ex. Sess., c. 2, s. 3 (As to applicability and contingency provisions, see 1991 Session Laws, Ex. Sess., c. 2, s. 7); Lee: 1989, c. 195, s. 3 (effective June 1, 1989, but only applicable to resolutions approved on or before Aug. 1, 1990); Wayne: 1987, c. 119 (only applicable to resolutions approved on or before Nov. 30, 1988).

§§ 153A-65 through 153A-75.

Reserved for future codification purposes.